Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2619.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Electrical Services Licensure Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The State Board of Electrical Licensure established 20260HB2619PN3618 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 301(a)."Commissioner." The Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs within the department."Conviction." Includes a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Electrical services." The installation, erection, repair, removal, maintenance, demolition or alteration of a component of a premises wiring system as defined in the version of the National Fire Protection Association 70 National Electric Code, or subsequent version adopted under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, including work performed on all components of electrical equipment and systems in buildings and structures and on premises, on a temporary basis or permanently, for the generation, transmission, distribution and utilization of electrical energy. Demolition of a premises wiring system includes the process of disconnecting, deenergizing premises wiring systems, or both, to make them safe for general demolition and removal."Licensed apprentice electrician." An individual who is registered as an apprentice under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, and licensed by the board as an individual whose principal occupation is learning and assisting in the performance of electrical services."Licensed electrical contractor." An individual who is licensed by the board and engages in the business of contracting to perform electrical services."Licensed electrician." An individual who is licensed by the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board and is authorized to perform electrical services."Licensed probationary electrical worker." An individual who is licensed by the board and is authorized to perform electrical services under the direct onsite supervision of a licensed electrician."Licensed residential electrician." An individual who is licensed by the board and is authorized to perform:(1) Work on projects involving the construction, alteration or repair of single-family houses or apartment buildings of no more than four stories in height.(2) Work on incidental items, including site work, parking areas, utilities, streets, roads and sidewalks at motels, assisted living facilities, auto dealerships, fast food restaurants, car washes, gas stations or country clubs or as part of any job having less than $10,000 in direct labor costs.(3) Electrical services under the direct onsite supervision of a licensed electrician."Licensee." An individual licensed by the board under this act."Premises wiring system." As follows:(1) Interior and exterior wiring, including power, lighting, control and signal circuit wiring together with all associated hardware, fittings and wiring devices, both permanently and temporarily installed, including:(i) Wiring from the service point or power source to the outlets, including all electrical raceways, cable assemblies, enclosures, conductors, generation equipment, utilization/distribution equipment, hangers, supports, devices and all other parts and components used in 20260HB2619PN3618 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems to transmit electricity in or on buildings, structures or on premises, including any class of power defined in the version of the National Fire Protection Association 70 National Electric Code, or subsequent version, adopted under the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.(ii) Wiring from and including the power source to the outlets where there is no service point.(2) Wiring under paragraph (1) does not include manufacturer included, Underwriter Laboratories (UL) listed wiring internal to appliances, luminaries, motors, controllers, motor control centers and similar equipment."Service point." The point of connection between the facilities of a serving utility and a premises wiring system.CHAPTER 3STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICAL LICENSURESection 301. Board.(a) Establishment.--The State Board of Electrical Licensure is established within the department.(b) Composition.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) The commissioner or a designee.(2) Two public members consistent with the requirements stated in section 813 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(3) Eight professional members as follows:(i) Two professional members must be electrical contractors subject to collective bargaining agreements.(ii) Two professional members must be electrical contractors not subject to collective bargaining 20260HB2619PN3618 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreements.(iii) Two professional members must be electricians subject to collective bargaining agreements.(iv) Two professional members must be electricians not subject to collective bargaining agreements.(c) Meeting.--The board shall meet not later than 30 days after the appointment of the board's initial members to:(1) Convene its first meeting.(2) Establish procedures for the board's operation and administration of this act.(3) Develop application forms for licensure.(d) Appointments and term of membership.--Except for the commissioner or a designee, the following apply to members of the board:(1) Members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.(2) Members must be citizens of the United States and residents of this Commonwealth.(3) The professional members must have been actively engaged in providing electrical services in this Commonwealth.(4) Except as specified in subsection (e), professional members must be licensed under this act as an electrical contractor or electrician.(5) Except as provided in paragraph (6), members shall serve a term of four years or until a successor has been appointed and qualified, but in no event longer than six months beyond the four-year period. In the event that a member dies or resigns or otherwise is disqualified during the term of office, a successor shall be appointed in the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same manner and with the same qualifications as the former member and shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. A member shall not be eligible to hold more than two consecutive terms.(6) Members first appointed to the board under this act shall serve terms of office as follows:(i) Four members shall serve for terms of four years.(ii) Four members shall serve for terms of three years.(iii) Two members shall serve for terms of two years.(e) Professional members and initial appointments.--Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Governor shall nominate 10 members to initial terms under subsection (d)(6). A professional member first appointed to the board under this act need not be licensed at the time of appointment but must satisfy eligibility requirements for licensure as provided in this act.(f) Quorum.--A majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board, to include at least two professional members subject to collective bargaining agreements and two professional members not subject to collective bargaining agreements, shall constitute a quorum. Except for temporary and automatic suspensions under section 705, a member may not be counted as part of a quorum or vote on any issue unless the member is in attendance at the meeting.(g) Chairperson.--The board shall annually select a chairperson from among the board's members.(h) Expenses.--With the exception of the commissioner, each 20260HB2619PN3618 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 member of the board shall receive a per diem when actually attending to the work of the board. A member shall also receive the amount of reasonable travel, hotel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties in accordance with Commonwealth regulations.(i) Forfeiture.--Except for the commissioner, a member who fails to attend three consecutive meetings shall forfeit the member's seat unless the commissioner, upon written request from the member, finds the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness, the death of a family member, military service or another legitimate reason acceptable to the commissioner.(j) Training seminars.--Except for the commissioner, a member who fails to attend two consecutive statutorily mandated training seminars in accordance with section 813(e) of The Administrative Code of 1929 shall forfeit the member's seat unless the commissioner, upon written request from the member, finds that the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness, the death of a family member, military service or another legitimate reason acceptable to the commissioner.(k) Frequency of meetings.--The board shall meet at least four times a year and at other additional times as may be necessary to conduct the business of the board.Section 302. Powers and duties of board.The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Provide for and regulate the licensing of individuals engaged in the provision of electrical services.(2) Issue, renew, reinstate, refuse to renew, suspend and revoke licenses as provided for in this act.(3) Administer and enforce this act.20260HB2619PN3618 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Contract with a professional testing organization to prepare and administer tests to qualified applicants seeking to be licensed as electrical contractors, electricians or residential electricians as provided in this act in the manner prescribed for written examinations under section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(5) Investigate applications for licensure and determine the eligibility of an individual applying for licensure.(6) Promulgate and enforce regulations consistent with this act as necessary to administer this act. This paragraph includes the setting of fees and the amount of professional liability insurance required by licensed electrical contractors. Regulations shall be adopted in conformity with the provisions of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(7) Keep minutes and records of all transactions and proceedings.(8) Keep and maintain a registry of individuals licensed by the board. The board shall provide access to the registry to the public, including making the registry available via electronic means, but shall limit the ability to sell a license list to a list of licensed electrical contractors only.(9) Annually submit to the department an estimate of financial requirements of the board for administrative, legal and other expenses.(10) Annually submit a report to the Consumer Protection 20260HB2619PN3618 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include a description of the types of complaints reviewed, the status of cases, the action that has been taken and the length of time from initial complaint to final resolution.(11) Annually submit to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, not later than 15 days after the Governor has submitted a budget to the General Assembly, a copy of the budget request for the upcoming fiscal year that the board previously submitted to the department.CHAPTER 5LICENSURESection 501. Licensure.(a) Requirement.--Except as provided in subsections (d) and (g), an individual may not provide electrical services, offer the individual for employment as someone who may provide electrical services or hold the individual out as someone authorized to provide electrical services unless licensed as a licensed electrician or licensed residential electrician by the board.(b) Business entities.--Subject to subsection (h), an individual, corporation, partnership, firm or other entity may not:(1) Contract to provide electrical services unless the person is licensed as a licensed electrical contractor in accordance with this act.(2) Enter into a contract for the provision of electrical services with a person that is not licensed as a 20260HB2619PN3618 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed electrical contractor under this act.(3) Employ an individual to provide electrical services or direct an individual to provide electrical services unless the person is licensed under this act.(4) Use the terms "licensed electrician," "licensed residential electrician" or "licensed electrical contractor" or another derivative in connection with the person unless at least one employee or, if the person is the owner, is licensed as a licensed electrician, licensed residential electrician or licensed electrical contractor in accordance with this act.(c) Title.--A person that holds a license as:(1) A licensed electrical contractor or a licensed electrical contractor on inactive status under section 506(b) may use the title "licensed electrical contractor" and the abbreviation "L.E.C." No other individual, corporation, partnership, firm or other entity may use the title "licensed electrical contractor" or the abbreviation "L.E.C."(2) A licensed electrician or a licensed electrician who is maintained on inactive status under section 506(b) may use the title "licensed electrician" and the abbreviation "L.E." No other individual may use the title "licensed electrician" or the abbreviation "L.E."(3) A licensed residential electrician or a licensed residential electrician on inactive status under section 506(b) may use the title "licensed residential electrician" and the abbreviation "L.R.E." No other individual may use the title "licensed residential electrician" or the abbreviation "L.R.E."(4) A licensed apprentice electrician or a licensed 20260HB2619PN3618 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apprentice electrician on inactive status under section 506(b) may use the title "licensed apprentice electrician" and the abbreviation "L.A.E." No other individual may use the title "licensed apprentice electrician" or the abbreviation "L.A.E."(d) Apprentice.--An individual who is a licensed apprentice electrician may hold the individual out as being authorized to provide electrical services if the individual works under the direct onsite supervision of a licensed electrician, including a licensed electrical contractor.(e) Responsibility.--A licensed electrical contractor under a contract for electrical services shall inspect and supervise electrical services performed by a licensed electrician, licensed residential electrician or licensed apprentice electrician employed by the electrical contractor under the contract.(f) Public notice of licensure.--(1) A licensed electrical contractor shall prominently display the license number to the public on official advertisements, contracts and proposals, letterhead and vehicles and via any other reasonable means determined by the board.(2) An individual licensed under this act shall be required to carry proof of licensure at all times while performing electrical services. Proof of licensure shall be presented to any code official, emergency responder or law enforcement official upon request.(3) The manner and means by which the license information must be displayed and furnished shall be established by regulation of the board.20260HB2619PN3618 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Prohibited actions by licensed electrical contractors.--A licensed electrical contractor may not:(1) Use the license to secure construction permits on behalf of a business entity other than the licensed electrical contractor's primary employer.(2) Manage or perform electrical work using licensed electrical workers who are not employed by their primary employer or a subcontractor of their primary employer.(3) Engage in securing construction permits or managing electrical construction work for more than one business entity at a time.(h) Exceptions to licensure.--This act shall not apply to, and a license shall not be required for, the following:(1) The replacement of lamps and fuses.(2) The connection of portable electronic appliances to permanently installed receptacles.(3) The installation, erection, repair, maintenance, removal, demolition or alteration of electrical equipment or electrical systems for generation, transmission, distribution or utilization of electrical energy in structures, facilities, buildings or premises owned or operated by a railway or the Federal Government.(4) Commercial radio and television transmission equipment.(5) Communications circuits.(6) Community antenna television and radio distribution systems.(7) Network-powered broadband communications systems.(8) Premises-powered broadband communications systems.(9) Removal of deenergized components of a premises 20260HB2619PN3618 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wiring system during demolition of a structure, facility or building.(10) The installation, erection, repair, maintenance, removal, demolition or alteration of electrical equipment under the exclusive control of an electric distribution company, as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions), or electrical cooperative corporation, completed by employees of the electric distribution company or electrical cooperative corporation, if the equipment:(i) consists of service drops or service laterals and associated metering;(ii) is located in legally established easements or rights-of-way designated or recognized by public service commissions, utility commissions, political subdivisions or other regulatory agencies having jurisdiction for the installations; or(iii) is located on property owned or leased by the public utility or electrical cooperative corporation for the purpose of communications, metering, generation, control, transformation, transmission or distribution of electrical energy.Section 502. Qualifications.(a) Licensed electrical contractor.--To be eligible for licensure as a licensed electrical contractor, an applicant must fulfill the following requirements:(1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).20260HB2619PN3618 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Be at least 23 years of age.(3) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant has:(i) successfully completed a program as a licensed apprentice electrician;(ii) successfully completed a program recognized by the board that trains individuals to provide electrical services; or(iii) acquired training and experience equivalent to programs specified in subparagraph (i) or (ii), as determined by regulation of the board.(4) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(5) Pass the examination approved by the board.(6) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant has worked at least 10,000 hours in electrical services.(7) Submit satisfactory proof to the board of the acquisition of professional liability insurance in an amount set by the board.(b) Licensed electrician.--To be eligible for licensure as a licensed electrician, an applicant must:(1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113.(2) Be at least 21 years of age.(3) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant has:(i) successfully completed an electrical 20260HB2619PN3618 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apprenticeship training program registered under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act; or(ii) completed at least 8,000 hours as a licensed residential electrician.(4) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(5) Pass the examination approved by the board.(c) Licensed residential electrician.--To be eligible for licensure as a licensed residential electrician, an applicant must:(1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113.(2) Be at least 19 years of age.(3) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(4) Pass the examination approved by the board.(d) Licensed apprentice electrician.--A licensed apprentice electrician under 18 years of age shall be subject to 34 Pa. Code Pt. 1 Ch. 11 Subch. B (relating to employment of minors in industry) and 29 CFR 570 (relating to child labor regulations, orders and statements of interpretation). To be eligible for licensure as a licensed apprentice electrician, an applicant must:(1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113.20260HB2619PN3618 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Be at least 16 years of age.(3) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(4) Register with the Department of Labor and Industry as specified in The Apprenticeship and Training Act. The applicant shall submit proof of current registration to the board.(e) Renewal of license of licensed apprentice electrician.--(1) In the case of a licensed apprentice electrician applying for renewal of a license if registration under subsection (d)(4) has expired or otherwise lapsed before the biennial renewal cycle will expire, the licensed apprentice electrician shall submit satisfactory evidence to the board that the licensed apprentice electrician has renewed registration.(2) Failure to notify the board within 30 days that registration has expired or otherwise lapsed shall subject the licensed apprentice electrician to disciplinary action. In the case of a licensed apprentice electrician whose registration has expired or otherwise lapsed, the license shall immediately be placed on inactive status by the board.(3) Licensed apprentice electricians shall be limited to four licensed apprentice electrician biennial renewals.(4) The board shall promulgate regulations in order to carry out the provisions of this subsection.(f) Licensed probationary electrical worker.--A licensed probationary electrical worker under 18 years of age shall be subject to 34 Pa. Code Pt. 1 Ch. 11 Subch. B and 29 CFR 570. To be eligible for licensure as a probationary electrical worker, an applicant must fulfill the following requirements:20260HB2619PN3618 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113.(2) Be at least 17 years of age.(3) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(g) Renewal of license of licensed probationary electrical worker.--(1) The renewal cycle shall be six months for individuals licensed as a probationary electrical worker.(2) Licensed probationary electrical workers shall be limited to one renewal of the six-month license. In order to continue performing electrical work after the renewed license has expired, the individual must apply and be approved for a license with a biennial renewal cycle.(3) Failure to notify the board not later than 30 days after registration has expired or otherwise lapsed shall subject the licensed probationary electrical worker to disciplinary action. In the case of a licensed probationary electrical worker whose registration has expired or otherwise lapsed, the license shall immediately be placed on inactive status by the board.(4) The board shall promulgate regulations to carry out this subsection.(h) Waiver of examination.--Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a)(5), (b)(5) and (c)(4), the board shall grant a license to an individual applying for a license under this act without examination if:(1) The individual applies within one year of the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of section 501.(2) The individual meets the requirement of age and character and pays the required fee.(3) For an individual applying for a license as a licensed electrician under this subsection, the individual either:(i) submits proof satisfactory to the board of being a current holder of an electrician license issued by a municipality of this Commonwealth, provided that the licensing requirements of the municipality are not less restrictive than this act or regulation of the board;(ii) submits proof satisfactory to the board of at least 10,000 hours of prior experience providing electrical services; or(iii) submits proof satisfactory to the board of completing an electrical apprenticeship training program registered under The Apprenticeship and Training Act.(4) For an individual applying for a license as a licensed residential electrician under this subsection, the individual either:(i) submits proof satisfactory to the board of being a current holder of an electrician license issued by a municipality of this Commonwealth, provided that the licensing requirements of the municipality are not less restrictive than this act or regulation of the board;(ii) submits proof satisfactory to the board of at least 6,000 hours of prior experience providing residential electrical services; or(iii) submits proof satisfactory to the board of completing an electrical apprenticeship training program 20260HB2619PN3618 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered under The Apprenticeship and Training Act.(5) For an individual applying for a license as a licensed electrical contractor under this subsection, the individual submits proof satisfactory to the board of currently holding an electrical contractor license issued by a municipality of this Commonwealth.(i) Convictions prohibited.--The board may not issue a license to an individual who has been convicted of a felonious act prohibited by the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or convicted of a felony related to a controlled substance in a court of law of the United States or any other state, territory or country unless:(1) At least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction.(2) The individual satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the individual has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction such that licensure of the individual should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations.(3) The individual otherwise satisfies the qualifications provided in this act. An individual's statement on the application declaring the absence of a conviction shall be deemed satisfactory evidence of the absence of a conviction unless the board has evidence to the contrary.(j) Change in employment status of licensed electrical contractor and continuance of business.--In the event of change in employment status, including death, illness, disability or 20260HB2619PN3618 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 change of employer of a licensee who qualified a business as a licensed electrical contractor, a business entity may continue to conduct business as a licensed electrical contractor for at least six months, but not more than one year, following the date of the licensee's change in employment status as long as the business is conducted under qualified supervision as the board deems adequate.Section 503. Continuing education.(a) Regulations.--(1) The board shall adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this act establishing continuing education to be met by individuals licensed as electrical contractors, electricians and residential electricians under this act. Regulations shall include any fees necessary for the board to carry out its responsibilities under this section.(2) The board may waive all or part of the continuing education requirement for an individual who submits satisfactory evidence to the board that the individual was unable to complete the requirement due to illness, emergency, military service or other hardship.(3) All courses, materials, locations and instructors shall be approved by the board.(4) No credit may be given for a course in office management or building a business.(b) Requirement.--Beginning with the licensure period designated by regulation:(1) An individual applying for renewal of a license as a licensed electrical contractor must obtain 16 hours of continuing education during the two calendar years 20260HB2619PN3618 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 immediately preceding the application for renewal.(2) An individual applying for renewal of a license as a licensed electrician or licensed residential electrician must obtain eight hours of continuing education during the two calendar years immediately preceding the application for renewal.Section 504. Liability insurance.(a) Requirement for biennial renewal.--As a condition of biennial renewal, a business entity qualified as a licensed electrical contractor shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board of the acquisition and maintenance of professional liability insurance in the amount set by the board.(b) Inactive status.--(1) In the case of the insurance being revoked, canceled or otherwise lapsing, the licensed electrical contractor shall notify the board in writing within 30 days. In such a case, the board shall immediately place the license of a licensed electrical contractor on inactive status.(2) Failure to notify the board in writing within 30 days as required under paragraph (1) shall subject the licensed electrical contractor to disciplinary action.Section 505. Licensed electrical contractors, electricians and residential electricians in other states.(a) Reciprocity established.--Subject to subsection (b), the board may issue a license without examination to an individual who is licensed as an electrical contractor, electrician, apprentice or residential electrician in any other state, territory or possession of the United States if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The individual meets the requirements as to 20260HB2619PN3618 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 character, age and absence of convictions.(2) The individual completes the application and pays the required fee.(3) The standards for licensure in the other state, territory or possession meet or exceed the standards specified in this act.(b) Requirement.--For an individual to be eligible to apply for a license as a licensed electrical contractor, licensed electrician or licensed residential electrician under subsection (a), the other state, territory or possession of the United States that licensed the individual must provide an opportunity for reciprocal licensure which is substantially similar to the opportunity provided by the Commonwealth under this section.(c) Alternative license.--The board may issue a license to an individual who is licensed as an electrical contractor, electrician, residential electrician or apprentice electrician who meets the qualifications for licensure by endorsement under 63 Pa.C.S. § 3111 (relating to licensure by endorsement) or Chapter 33 (relating to military and veterans' licensure).(d) Temporary electrician license.--An electrical worker permanently residing in a jurisdiction outside of the Commonwealth who does not qualify for licensure shall be permitted to apply for a temporary license to engage in electrical work while they are seeking a permanent electrician or residential electrician license. To be eligible for a temporary electrician license, an applicant must fulfill the following requirements:(1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in 20260HB2619PN3618 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).(2) Be at least 19 years of age.(3) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant has done one of the following:(i) Successfully completed an electrical workforce training program.(ii) Completed at least 8,000 hours of experience performing electrical work.(4) Complete the application and pay the fee set by the board.(5) Provide proof that the individual is scheduled to take the electrician or residential electrician exam approved by the board within 90 days of the application.(e) Term of temporary license.--(1) The term of a temporary electrician license shall be at least 90 days and not more than 180 days as determined by the board.(2) Renewals of temporary electrician licenses shall be prohibited.(3) Failure to be approved for a permanent electrician or residential electrician license during the term of the temporary license shall prohibit the individual from performing electrical work in this Commonwealth until a permanent license is approved by the board.Section 506. Duration of license.(a) Duration of license.--(1) Except probationary and temporary licenses, a license issued under this act shall be issued on a biennial basis. The biennial expiration date shall be established by 20260HB2619PN3618 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulation of the board.(2) Application for renewal of a license shall biennially be forwarded to an individual holding a current license prior to the expiration date of the current biennium.(3) For individuals applying for licensure or renewal of licensure as a licensed apprentice electrician, the application form must indicate whether registration as an apprentice under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, has expired or otherwise lapsed before the biennial renewal cycle will expire.(b) Inactive status.--(1) An individual licensed under this act may request an application for inactive status. The application form may be completed and returned to the board.(2) Upon receipt of an application, the individual shall be maintained on inactive status without fee and shall be entitled to apply for a licensure renewal at any time.(3) An individual who requests the board to activate the individual's license and has been on inactive status shall, prior to receiving an active license, satisfy the requirements of the board's regulations regarding continuing education and remit the required fee.(4) In the case of a licensed apprentice electrician who is placed on inactive status under section 502(e), the licensed apprentice electrician shall provide evidence to the board of renewal of registration before the board may activate the license.(5) The board shall promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this subsection.20260HB2619PN3618 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 507. Reporting of multiple licensure.(a) Duty to report.--A licensee who is licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or another country shall report this information to the board on the biennial registration application. Disciplinary action taken in another state, territory or possession of the United States or another country shall be reported to the board on the biennial registration application or within 90 days of final disposition, whichever is sooner.(b) Notice to other states.--Multiple licensure shall be noted by the board on the individual's record and the state, territory or possession of the United States or another country that licensed the individual shall be notified by the board of disciplinary action taken against the licensee in this Commonwealth.CHAPTER 7ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENTSection 701. Fees, fines and civil penalties.(a) Authorities of board.--(1) Fees required under this act shall be fixed by the board by regulation and shall be subject to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) If the revenues raised by the fees, fines and civil penalties imposed under this act are insufficient to meet expenditures over a two-year period, the board shall increase the fees by regulation so that projected revenues will meet or exceed projected expenditures.(b) Fee increase.--If the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs determines that the fees established by the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board under subsection (a) are insufficient to meet the minimum enforcement efforts required by this act, the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs, after consultation with the board and subject to the Regulatory Review Act, shall increase the fees by regulation in an amount such that adequate revenues are raised to meet the required enforcement effort.(c) Account.--Fees, fines and civil penalties imposed in accordance with this act shall be paid into the Professional Licensure Augmentation Account established under and for use in accordance with the act of July 1, 1978 (P.L.700, No.124), known as the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs Fee Act.(d) Permitted fees.--The board may charge a fee, as set by the board by regulation, for licensure, for renewing licensure and for other services of the board as permitted by this act or by regulation.Section 702. Violations.(a) Criminal penalty.--An individual or the responsible officer or employee of a corporation, partnership, firm or other entity who violates a provision of this act or a regulation of the board commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $2,000 or to imprisonment for not more than six months for the first violation. For the second and each subsequent conviction, the person convicted shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more than $5,000 or to imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than one year, or both.(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law or by a vote of the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 majority of the qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of five members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to $10,000 for any of the following:(1) A licensee who violates a provision of this act or regulation of the board.(2) An individual who performs or contracts to perform electrical services in violation of this act.(3) An individual who holds the individual out as someone authorized to perform electrical services without being properly licensed as provided for in this act.(4) The responsible officers or employees of a corporation, partnership, firm or other entity violate a provision of this act.(c) Procedure.--The board shall levy the civil penalty specified in subsection (b) only after affording the accused the opportunity for a hearing as provided for in 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 703. Suspension, revocation or refusal to issue license.(a) Authority of board.--The board may refuse to issue, suspend or revoke a license if the board finds:(1) The licensee is negligent or incompetent in the performance of electrical services.(2) The licensee is unable to perform electrical services with reasonable skill and safety by reason of mental or physical illness or condition or physiological or psychological dependence upon alcohol, hallucinogenic or narcotic drugs or other drugs which tend to impair judgment or coordination, as long as the dependence continues. The following apply:20260HB2619PN3618 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) In enforcing this paragraph, the board may, upon probable cause, compel a licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination as designated by the board.(ii) After notice, hearing, adjudication and appeal, failure of a licensee to submit to an examination when directed shall constitute an admission of the allegations unless failure is due to circumstances beyond the licensee's control, consequent upon which a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence.(iii) An individual affected under this paragraph shall at reasonable intervals be afforded the opportunity to demonstrate that the individual can resume competent, safe and skillful performance of electrical services.(3) The licensee has violated a provision of this act or a regulation of the board.(4) The licensee has committed fraud or deceit in:(i) the performance of electrical services; or(ii) securing licensure.(5) The licensee has been convicted of a felony or a crime of moral turpitude or been convicted of a misdemeanor related to providing electrical services or received probation without verdict, disposition in lieu of trial or an Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition in the disposition of felony charges in the courts of this Commonwealth, the United States, another state, territory or possession of the United States or another country.(6) The licensee has had the licensee's license to practice as an electrician, residential electrician or electrical contractor suspended or revoked or has received 20260HB2619PN3618 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other disciplinary action by the proper licensing authority in another state, territory or possession of the United States or another country.(7) With respect to the provision of electrical services, the licensee has acted in such a manner as to present an immediate and clear danger to health, safety or property.(8) The licensed electrical contractor failed to properly direct and supervise licensed electricians, licensed residential electricians, licensed apprentice electricians, licensed probationary electrical workers or licensed temporary electricians who perform under a contract.(9) In the case of a licensed electrician responsible for the direct onsite supervision of a licensed apprentice electrician, licensed residential electrician or licensed probationary electrical workers, the licensed electrician failed to provide the proper supervision.(10) In the case of a licensed residential electrician responsible for the direct onsite supervision of a licensed apprentice electrician or licensed probationary electrical worker, the licensed residential electrician failed to provide the proper supervision.(11) The licensee possessed, used, acquired or distributed a controlled substance.(12) The licensee has been guilty of unprofessional conduct, including departure from or failing to conform to operating practices or professional standards embraced by the licensed electricians' and licensed residential electricians' communities in this Commonwealth and failing to conform to recognized electrical safety standards, including the 20260HB2619PN3618 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 National Electrical Code in effect in this Commonwealth, and applicable municipal ordinances related to health and safety. In a proceeding based on this paragraph, actual injury to a person or damage to property need not be established.(13) The licensee falsely advertised or made misleading, deceptive, untrue or fraudulent material representations regarding licensure or in the performance of electrical services.(14) Unless waived by the board in accordance with section 503, the licensee failed to satisfy the continuing education requirements of this act.(15) Any other acts the board deems sufficient to warrant refusal to issue, suspend or revoke a license.(b) Acts authorized.--If the board finds that a license of an individual may be refused, suspended or revoked under subsection (a), the board may:(1) deny the application for the license;(2) impose a fine;(3) administer a public reprimand;(4) suspend, revoke, limit or otherwise restrict the license;(5) require a licensee to submit to the care, counseling or treatment of a licensed medical professional designated by the board;(6) suspend enforcement of the board's finding and place a licensee on probation with the right to vacate the probationary order for noncompliance; or(7) restore or reissue, at the board's discretion, a suspended license and impose any disciplinary or corrective measure which the board might originally have imposed.20260HB2619PN3618 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 704. Suspensions and revocations.A suspension or revocation shall be made only in accordance with the regulations of the board and only by majority vote of the members of the board after a hearing. An action of the board shall be taken subject to the right of notice, hearing and adjudication and the right of appeal, in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure). The board, by majority action and in accordance with the board's regulations, may reissue a license which has been suspended. If a license has been revoked, the board shall reissue a license only in accordance with section 706.Section 705. Temporary and automatic suspensions.(a) Procedure.--(1) A license issued under this act may be temporarily suspended under circumstances determined by the board to be an immediate and clear danger to public health, safety or property. The board shall issue an order of temporary suspension without a hearing, but upon due notice, to the licensee concerned at the licensee's last known address, which shall include a written statement of all allegations against the licensee. The provisions of section 704 shall not apply to temporary suspension.(2) The board shall commence formal action to suspend, revoke or restrict the license of the individual as otherwise provided for in this act.(3) All actions shall be taken promptly and without delay.(4) Not later than 30 days after issuance of an order temporarily suspending a license, the board shall conduct or cause to be conducted a preliminary hearing to determine if 20260HB2619PN3618 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 there is a prima facie case supporting the suspension. The individual whose license has been temporarily suspended may be present at the preliminary hearing and may be represented by counsel, cross-examine witnesses, inspect physical evidence, call witnesses, offer evidence and testimony and make a record of the proceedings.(5) If it is determined that there is not a prima facie case, the suspended license shall be immediately restored. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until vacated by the board, but in no event longer than 180 days.(b) Automatic suspension.--(1) A license issued under this act shall automatically be suspended upon:(i) conviction of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act; or(ii) conviction of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(2) Automatic suspension under this subsection may not be stayed pending an appeal of a conviction.(3) Restoration of the license shall be made as provided in the case of revocation or suspension of a license.Section 706. Reinstatement of license.Unless ordered to do so by Commonwealth Court or an appeal therefrom, the board may not reinstate an individual's license that has been revoked. An individual whose license has been revoked may reapply for a license after a period of at least five years but must meet all of the licensing requirements of 20260HB2619PN3618 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act.Section 707. Surrender of suspended or revoked license.An individual whose license has been suspended or revoked under this act shall return the license in such manner as the board directs. Failure to surrender the license shall be a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 708. Injunction.When, in the judgment of the board, a person has engaged in an act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this act, the board or its agents may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the act or practice. Upon a showing by the board that the person has engaged or is about to engage in the act or practice, an injunction, restraining order or other order as may be appropriate shall be granted by the court. The remedy of injunction is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty.Section 709. Subpoenas and oaths.(a) Authority granted.--(1) The board may issue subpoenas, upon application of an attorney responsible for representing the Commonwealth in disciplinary matters before the board, for the purpose of investigating alleged violations of this act or regulations of the board. The board may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and take testimony or compel the production of books, records, papers and documents as the board may deem necessary or proper in and pertinent to any proceeding, investigation or hearing held or had by the board.(2) The board may apply to Commonwealth Court to enforce 20260HB2619PN3618 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any subpoena of the board.(3) The court may impose limitations in the scope of the subpoena as is necessary to prevent unnecessary intrusion into client confidential information.(b) Disciplinary matters.--An attorney authorized to represent the Commonwealth in disciplinary matters before the board shall maintain current records of all reported alleged violations and shall periodically review the records for the purpose of determining that each alleged violation has been resolved in a timely manner.Section 710. Municipalities.(a) Municipal license prohibited.--(1) Licensure under this act shall be acceptable to a municipality in this Commonwealth as proof of competence to perform electrical services, and a municipality may not require an individual licensed under this act to obtain an additional license to perform electrical services.(2) Unless otherwise provided in this act, a local ordinance or regulation concerning the qualifications, fitness and competence of individuals to perform electrical services is preempted and superseded.(b) Certain powers preserved.--Nothing in this act may be construed to prevent a municipality from:(1) levying lawful taxes and fees;(2) requiring the purchase of a business privilege license that is unrelated to demonstrating competence in the performance of electrical services;(3) denying or revoking permits for failing to comply with ordinances that are not inconsistent with this act or regulation of the board;20260HB2619PN3618 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) enforcing ordinances related to health and safety; or(5) under ordinance, inspecting or regulating the manner in which electrical services are performed.CHAPTER 21MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2101. Appropriation.The sum of $250,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Professional Licensure Augmentation Account to the department for the payment of costs associated with processing licenses and renewing licenses for the operation of the board and for other costs associated with this act. The amount of the appropriation shall be repaid by the board within three years of the beginning of issuance of licenses by the board.Section 2102. Regulations.Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this section, the board shall promulgate regulations to administer this act.Section 2103. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Sections 501, 505 and 702 of the act shall take effect in two years.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2619PN3618 - 36 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526